Illinois, session 104th, SB1463.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Dental Practice Act is amended by 5changing Sections 4, 17, 18, and 18.1 and by adding Sections 613.2 and 13.4 as follows: 7    (225 ILCS 25/4)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)9    Sec. 4. Definitions. As used in this Act:10    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 11by the Department in the applicant's or licensee's application 12file or license file as maintained by the Department's 13licensure maintenance unit. It is the duty of the applicant or 14licensee to inform the Department of any change of address and 15those changes must be made either through the Department's 16website or by contacting the Department. 17    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 18Professional Regulation.19    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 20Professional Regulation.21    "Board" means the Board of Dentistry.22    "Dentist" means a person who has received a general 23license pursuant to subsection paragraph (a) of Section 11 of   SB1463 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1this Act and who may perform any intraoral and extraoral 2procedure required in the practice of dentistry and to whom is 3reserved the responsibilities specified in Section 17.4    "Dental hygienist" means a person who holds a license 5under this Act to perform dental services as authorized by 6Section 18.7    "Dental assistant" means an appropriately trained person 8who, under the supervision of a dentist, provides dental 9services as authorized by Section 17.10    "Expanded function dental assistant" means a dental 11assistant who has completed the training required by Section 1217.1 of this Act. 13    "Dental laboratory" means a person, firm, or corporation 14which:15        (i) engages in making, providing, repairing, or 16    altering dental prosthetic appliances and other artificial 17    materials and devices which are returned to a dentist for 18    insertion into the human oral cavity or which come in 19    contact with its adjacent structures and tissues; and20        (ii) utilizes or employs a dental technician to 21    provide such services; and22        (iii) performs such functions only for a dentist or 23    dentists.24    "Supervision" means supervision of a dental hygienist or a 25dental assistant requiring that a dentist authorize the 26procedure, remain in the dental facility while the procedure   SB1463 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1is performed, and approve the work performed by the dental 2hygienist or dental assistant before dismissal of the patient, 3but does not mean that the dentist must be present at all times 4in the treatment room.5    "General supervision" means supervision of a dental 6hygienist requiring that the patient be a patient of record, 7that the dentist examine the patient in accordance with 8Section 18 prior to treatment by the dental hygienist, and 9that the dentist authorize the procedures which are being 10carried out by a notation in the patient's record, but not 11requiring that a dentist be present when the authorized 12procedures are being performed. The issuance of a prescription 13to a dental laboratory by a dentist does not constitute 14general supervision.15    "Public member" means a person who is not a health 16professional. For purposes of board membership, any person 17with a significant financial interest in a health service or 18profession is not a public member.19    "Dentistry" means the healing art which is concerned with 20the examination, diagnosis, treatment planning, and care of 21conditions within the human oral cavity and its adjacent 22tissues and structures, as further specified in Section 17.23    "Branches of dentistry" means the various specialties of 24dentistry which, for purposes of this Act, shall be limited to 25the following: endodontics, oral and maxillofacial surgery, 26orthodontics and dentofacial orthopedics, pediatric dentistry,   SB1463 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1periodontics, prosthodontics, oral and maxillofacial 2radiology, and dental anesthesiology, oral and maxillofacial 3pathology, dental public health, oral medicine, and orofacial 4pain.5    "Specialist" means a dentist who has received a specialty 6license pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 11 11(b).7    "Dental technician" means a person who owns, operates, or 8is employed by a dental laboratory and engages in making, 9providing, repairing, or altering dental prosthetic appliances 10and other artificial materials and devices which are returned 11to a dentist for insertion into the human oral cavity or which 12come in contact with its adjacent structures and tissues.13    "Informed consent" means legally valid consent that is 14given by a patient or legal guardian, that is recorded in 15writing or digitally, that authorizes intervention or 16treatment services from the treating dentist, and that 17documents agreement to participate in those services and 18knowledge of the risks, benefits, and alternatives, including 19the decision to withdraw from or decline treatment. 20    "Impaired dentist" or "impaired dental hygienist" means a 21dentist or dental hygienist who is unable to practice with 22reasonable skill and safety because of a physical or mental 23disability as evidenced by a written determination or written 24consent based on clinical evidence, including deterioration 25through the aging process, loss of motor skills, abuse of 26drugs or alcohol, or a psychiatric disorder, of sufficient   SB1463 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1degree to diminish the person's ability to deliver competent 2patient care.3    "Nurse" means a registered professional nurse, a certified 4registered nurse anesthetist licensed as an advanced practice 5registered nurse, or a licensed practical nurse licensed under 6the Nurse Practice Act.7    "Patient of record", except as provided in Section 17.2, 8means a patient for whom the patient's most recent dentist has 9obtained a relevant medical and dental history and on whom the 10dentist has performed a physical examination within the last 11year and evaluated the condition to be treated, including a 12review of the patient's most recent x-rays.13    "Dental responder" means a dentist or dental hygienist who 14is appropriately certified in disaster preparedness, 15immunizations, and dental humanitarian medical response 16consistent with the Society of Disaster Medicine and Public 17Health and training certified by the National Incident 18Management System or the National Disaster Life Support 19Foundation. 20    "Mobile dental van or portable dental unit" means any 21self-contained or portable dental unit in which dentistry is 22practiced that can be moved, towed, or transported from one 23location to another in order to establish a location where 24dental services can be provided.25    "Public health dental hygienist" means a hygienist who 26holds a valid license to practice in the State, has 2 years of   SB1463 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1full-time clinical experience or an equivalent of 4,000 hours 2of clinical experience, and has completed at least 42 clock 3hours of additional structured courses in dental education in 4advanced areas specific to public health dentistry.5    "Public health setting" means a federally qualified health 6center; a federal, State, or local public health facility; 7Head Start; a special supplemental nutrition program for 8Women, Infants, and Children (WIC) facility; a certified 9school-based health center or school-based oral health 10program; a prison; or a long-term care facility.11    "Public health supervision" means the supervision of a 12public health dental hygienist by a licensed dentist who has a 13written public health supervision agreement with that public 14health dental hygienist while working in an approved facility 15or program that allows the public health dental hygienist to 16treat patients, without a dentist first examining the patient 17and being present in the facility during treatment, (1) who 18are eligible for Medicaid or (2) who are uninsured or whose 19household income is not greater than 300% of the federal 20poverty level. 21    "Teledentistry" means the use of telehealth systems and 22methodologies in dentistry and includes patient diagnosis, 23treatment planning, care, and education delivery for a patient 24of record using synchronous and asynchronous communications 25under an Illinois licensed dentist's authority as provided 26under this Act.  SB1463 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1    "Moderate sedation" means a drug-induced depression of 2consciousness during which: (1) patients respond purposefully 3to verbal commands, either alone or accompanied by light 4tactile stimulation; (2) no interventions are required to 5maintain a patient's airway and spontaneous ventilation is 6adequate; and (3) cardiovascular function is usually 7maintained.8    "Deep sedation" means a drug-induced depression of 9consciousness during which: (1) patients cannot be easily 10aroused, but respond purposefully following repeated or 11painful stimulation; (2) the ability to independently maintain 12ventilatory function may be impaired; (3) patients may require 13assistance in maintaining airways and spontaneous ventilation 14may be inadequate; and (4) cardiovascular function is usually 15maintained.16    "General anesthesia" means a drug-induced loss of 17consciousness during which: (1) patients are not arousable, 18even by painful stimulation; (2) the ability to independently 19maintain ventilatory function is often impaired; (3) patients 20often require assistance in maintaining airways and positive 21pressure ventilation may be required because of depressed 22spontaneous ventilation or drug-induced depression of 23neuromuscular function; and (4) cardiovascular function may be 24impaired.25    "Venipuncture" means the puncture of a vein as part of a 26medical procedure, typically to withdraw a blood sample or for   SB1463 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1an intravenous catheter for the administration of medication 2or fluids.3    "Enteral route of administration" means administration of 4a drug that is absorbed through the gastrointestinal tract or 5through oral, rectal, or sublingual mucosa.6    "Parenteral route of administration" means administration 7of a drug by which the drug bypasses the gastrointestinal 8tract through intramuscular, intravenous, intranasal, 9submucosal, subcutaneous, or intraosseous methods. 10(Source: P.A. 102-93, eff. 1-1-22; 102-588, eff. 8-20-21; 11102-936, eff. 1-1-23; 103-425, eff. 1-1-24; 103-431, eff. 121-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-628, eff. 7-1-24; 103-902, 13eff. 8-9-24; revised 10-10-24.) 14    (225 ILCS 25/13.2 new)15    Sec. 13.2. Practice of license-pending general dentists.16    (a) An applicant for licensure as general dentist under 17this Act may obtain employment as a license-pending general 18dentist and practice under the delegation of a licensed 19general dentist. An applicant may be employed as a 20license-pending general dentist if all of the following 21criteria are met:22        (1) the applicant has completed and passed the 23    Department-approved licensure examination and presents to 24    the employer an official written notification indicating 25    successful passage of the licensure examination;  SB1463 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1        (2) the applicant has completed and submitted to the 2    Department an application for a general dentist license 3    under this Act; and4        (3) the applicant has submitted the required licensure 5    fee.6    (b) An applicant's authorization to practice under this 7Section shall terminate upon the occurrence of any of the 8following:9        (1) receipt of a general dentist license from the 10    Department;11        (2) notification from the Department that the 12    applicant's application for licensure has been denied;13        (3) a request by the Department that the applicant 14    terminate practicing as a license-pending general dentist 15    until an official decision is made by the Department to 16    grant or deny a general dentist license to the applicant; 17    or18        (4) 6 months elapsing since the official date of the 19    applicant's passage of the licensure examination, as 20    specified on the formal written notification provided to 21    the applicant upon passage of the examination. The 6-month 22    period may be extended by the Department by rule. 23    (225 ILCS 25/13.4 new)24    Sec. 13.4. Practice of license-pending dental hygienists.25    (a) An applicant for licensure as a dental hygienist under   SB1463 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1this Act may obtain employment as a license-pending dental 2hygienist and practice under the delegation of a licensed 3general dentist. An individual may be employed as a 4license-pending dental hygienist if all of the following 5criteria are met:6        (1) the applicant has completed and passed the 7    Department-approved licensure examination and presents to 8    the employer an official written notification indicating 9    successful passage of the licensure examination;10        (2) the applicant has completed and submitted to the 11    Department an application for a dental hygienist license 12    under this Act; and13        (3) the applicant has submitted the required licensure 14    fee.15    (b) An applicant's authorization to practice under this 16Section shall terminate upon the occurrence of any of the 17following:18        (1) receipt of a dental hygienist license from the 19    Department;20        (2) notification from the Department that the 21    applicant's application for licensure has been denied;22        (3) a request by the Department that the applicant 23    terminate practicing as a license-pending dental hygienist 24    until an official decision is made by the Department to 25    grant or deny a dental hygienist license to the applicant; 26    or  SB1463 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1        (4) 6 months elapsing since the official date of the 2    applicant's passage of the licensure examination, as 3    specified on the formal written notification provided to 4    the applicant upon passage of the examination. The 6-month 5    period may be extended by the Department by rule. 6    (225 ILCS 25/17)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)8    Sec. 17. Acts constituting the practice of dentistry. A 9person practices dentistry, within the meaning of this Act:10        (1) Who represents himself or herself as being able to 11    diagnose or diagnoses, treats, prescribes, or operates for 12    any disease, pain, deformity, deficiency, injury, or 13    physical condition of the human tooth, teeth, alveolar 14    process, gums, or jaw; or15        (2) Who is a manager, proprietor, operator, or 16    conductor of a business where dental operations are 17    performed; or18        (3) Who performs dental operations of any kind; or19        (4) Who uses an X-Ray machine or X-Ray films for 20    dental diagnostic purposes; or21        (5) Who extracts a human tooth or teeth, or corrects 22    or attempts to correct malpositions of the human teeth or 23    jaws; or24        (6) Who offers or undertakes, by any means or method, 25    to diagnose, treat, or remove stains, calculus, and   SB1463 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1    bonding materials from human teeth or jaws; or2        (7) Who uses or administers local or general 3    anesthetics in the treatment of dental or oral diseases or 4    in any preparation incident to a dental operation of any 5    kind or character; or6        (8) Who takes material or digital scans for final 7    impressions of the human tooth, teeth, or jaws or performs 8    any phase of any operation incident to the replacement of 9    a part of a tooth, a tooth, teeth, or associated tissues by 10    means of a filling, a crown, a bridge, a denture, or other 11    appliance; or12        (9) Who offers to furnish, supply, construct, 13    reproduce, or repair, or who furnishes, supplies, 14    constructs, reproduces, or repairs, prosthetic dentures, 15    bridges, or other substitutes for natural teeth to the 16    user or prospective user thereof; or17        (10) Who instructs students on clinical matters or 18    performs any clinical operation included in the curricula 19    of recognized dental schools and colleges; or20        (11) Who takes material or digital scans for final 21    impressions of human teeth or places his or her hands in 22    the mouth of any person for the purpose of applying teeth 23    whitening materials, or who takes impressions of human 24    teeth or places his or her hands in the mouth of any person 25    for the purpose of assisting in the application of teeth 26    whitening materials. A person does not practice dentistry   SB1463 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1    when he or she discloses to the consumer that he or she is 2    not licensed as a dentist under this Act and (i) discusses 3    the use of teeth whitening materials with a consumer 4    purchasing these materials; (ii) provides instruction on 5    the use of teeth whitening materials with a consumer 6    purchasing these materials; or (iii) provides appropriate 7    equipment on-site to the consumer for the consumer to 8    self-apply teeth whitening materials. 9    The fact that any person engages in or performs, or offers 10to engage in or perform, any of the practices, acts, or 11operations set forth in this Section, shall be prima facie 12evidence that such person is engaged in the practice of 13dentistry.14    The following practices, acts, and operations, however, 15are exempt from the operation of this Act:16        (a) The rendering of dental relief in emergency cases 17    in the practice of his or her profession by a physician or 18    surgeon, licensed as such under the laws of this State, 19    unless he or she undertakes to reproduce or reproduces 20    lost parts of the human teeth in the mouth or to restore or 21    replace lost or missing teeth in the mouth; or22        (b) The practice of dentistry in the discharge of 23    their official duties by dentists in any branch of the 24    Armed Services of the United States, the United States 25    Public Health Service, or the United States Veterans 26    Administration; or  SB1463 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1        (c) The practice of dentistry by students in their 2    course of study in dental schools or colleges approved by 3    the Department, when acting under the direction and 4    supervision of dentists acting as instructors; or5        (d) The practice of dentistry by clinical instructors 6    in the course of their teaching duties in dental schools 7    or colleges approved by the Department:8            (i) when acting under the direction and 9        supervision of dentists, provided that such clinical 10        instructors have instructed continuously in this State 11        since January 1, 1986; or12            (ii) when holding the rank of full professor at 13        such approved dental school or college and possessing 14        a current valid license or authorization to practice 15        dentistry in another country; or16        (e) The practice of dentistry by licensed dentists of 17    other states or countries at meetings of the Illinois 18    State Dental Society or component parts thereof, alumni 19    meetings of dental colleges, or any other like dental 20    organizations, while appearing as clinicians; or21        (f) The use of X-Ray machines for exposing X-Ray films 22    of dental or oral tissues by dental hygienists or dental 23    assistants; or24        (g) The performance of any dental service by a dental 25    assistant, if such service is performed under the 26    supervision and full responsibility of a dentist. In   SB1463 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1    addition, after being authorized by a dentist, a dental 2    assistant may, for the purpose of eliminating pain or 3    discomfort, remove loose, broken, or irritating 4    orthodontic appliances on a patient of record. 5        For purposes of this paragraph (g), "dental service" 6    is defined to mean any intraoral procedure or act which 7    shall be prescribed by rule or regulation of the 8    Department. "Dental service", however, shall not include:9            (1) Any and all diagnosis of or prescription for 10        treatment of disease, pain, deformity, deficiency, 11        injury, or physical condition of the human teeth or 12        jaws, or adjacent structures.13            (2) Removal of, restoration of, or addition to the 14        hard or soft tissues of the oral cavity, except for the 15        placing, carving, and finishing of amalgam 16        restorations and placing, packing, and finishing 17        composite restorations by dental assistants who have 18        had additional formal education and certification. 19            A dental assistant may place, carve, and finish 20        amalgam restorations, place, pack, and finish 21        composite restorations, and place interim restorations 22        if he or she (A) has successfully completed a 23        structured training program as described in item (2) 24        of subsection (g) provided by an educational 25        institution accredited by the Commission on Dental 26        Accreditation, such as a dental school or dental   SB1463 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1        hygiene or dental assistant program, or (B) has at 2        least 4,000 hours of direct clinical patient care 3        experience and has successfully completed a structured 4        training program as described in item (2) of 5        subsection (g) provided by a statewide dental 6        association, approved by the Department to provide 7        continuing education, that has developed and conducted 8        training programs for expanded functions for dental 9        assistants or hygienists. The training program must: 10        (i) include a minimum of 16 hours of didactic study and 11        14 hours of clinical manikin instruction; all training 12        programs shall include areas of study in nomenclature, 13        caries classifications, oral anatomy, periodontium, 14        basic occlusion, instrumentations, pulp protection 15        liners and bases, dental materials, matrix and wedge 16        techniques, amalgam placement and carving, rubber dam 17        clamp placement, and rubber dam placement and removal; 18        (ii) include an outcome assessment examination that 19        demonstrates competency; (iii) require the supervising 20        dentist to observe and approve the completion of 8 21        amalgam or composite restorations; and (iv) issue a 22        certificate of completion of the training program, 23        which must be kept on file at the dental office and be 24        made available to the Department upon request. A 25        dental assistant must have successfully completed an 26        approved coronal polishing and dental sealant course   SB1463 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1        prior to taking the amalgam and composite restoration 2        course. 3            A dentist utilizing dental assistants shall not 4        supervise more than 4 dental assistants at any one 5        time for placing, carving, and finishing of amalgam 6        restorations or for placing, packing, and finishing 7        composite restorations.8            (3) Any and all correction of malformation of 9        teeth or of the jaws.10            (4) Administration of anesthetics, except for 11        monitoring of nitrous oxide, moderate sedation, deep 12        sedation, and general anesthetic as provided in 13        Section 8.1 of this Act, that may be performed only 14        after successful completion of a training program 15        approved by the Department. A dentist utilizing dental 16        assistants shall not supervise more than 4 dental 17        assistants at any one time for the monitoring of 18        nitrous oxide.19            (5) Removal of calculus from human teeth.20            (6) Taking of material or digital scans for final 21        impressions for the fabrication of prosthetic 22        appliances, crowns, bridges, inlays, onlays, or other 23        restorative or replacement dentistry.24            (7) The operative procedure of dental hygiene 25        consisting of oral prophylactic procedures, except for 26        coronal polishing and pit and fissure sealants, which   SB1463 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1        may be performed by a dental assistant who has 2        successfully completed a training program approved by 3        the Department. Dental assistants may perform coronal 4        polishing under the following circumstances: (i) the 5        coronal polishing shall be limited to polishing the 6        clinical crown of the tooth and existing restorations, 7        supragingivally; (ii) the dental assistant performing 8        the coronal polishing shall be limited to the use of 9        rotary instruments using a rubber cup or brush 10        polishing method (air polishing is not permitted); and 11        (iii) the supervising dentist shall not supervise more 12        than 4 dental assistants at any one time for the task 13        of coronal polishing or pit and fissure sealants.14            In addition to coronal polishing and pit and 15        fissure sealants as described in this item (7), a 16        dental assistant who has at least 2,000 hours of 17        direct clinical patient care experience and who has 18        successfully completed a structured training program 19        provided by (1) an educational institution including, 20        but not limited to, a dental school or dental hygiene 21        or dental assistant program, (2) a continuing 22        education provider approved by the Department, or (3) 23        a statewide dental or dental hygienist association 24        that has developed and conducted a training program 25        for expanded functions for dental assistants or 26        hygienists may perform: (A) coronal scaling above the   SB1463 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1        gum line, supragingivally, on the clinical crown of 2        the tooth only on patients 17 years of age or younger 3        who have an absence of periodontal disease and who are 4        not medically compromised or individuals with special 5        needs and (B) intracoronal temporization of a tooth. 6        The training program must: (I) include a minimum of 32 7        hours of instruction in both didactic and clinical 8        manikin or human subject instruction; all training 9        programs shall include areas of study in dental 10        anatomy, public health dentistry, medical history, 11        dental emergencies, and managing the pediatric 12        patient; (II) include an outcome assessment 13        examination that demonstrates competency; (III) 14        require the supervising dentist to observe and approve 15        the completion of 6 full mouth supragingival scaling 16        procedures unless the training was received as part of 17        a Commission on Dental Accreditation approved dental 18        assistant program; and (IV) issue a certificate of 19        completion of the training program, which must be kept 20        on file at the dental office and be made available to 21        the Department upon request. A dental assistant must 22        have successfully completed an approved coronal 23        polishing course prior to taking the coronal scaling 24        course. A dental assistant performing these functions 25        shall be limited to the use of hand instruments only. 26        In addition, coronal scaling as described in this   SB1463 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1        paragraph shall only be utilized on patients who are 2        eligible for Medicaid, who are uninsured, or whose 3        household income is not greater than 300% of the 4        federal poverty level. A dentist may not supervise 5        more than 2 dental assistants at any one time for the 6        task of coronal scaling. This paragraph is inoperative 7        on and after January 1, 2026.8        The limitations on the number of dental assistants a 9    dentist may supervise contained in items (2), (4), and (7) 10    of this paragraph (g) mean a limit of 4 total dental 11    assistants or dental hygienists doing expanded functions 12    covered by these Sections being supervised by one dentist; 13    or14        (h) The practice of dentistry by an individual who:15            (i) has applied in writing to the Department, in 16        form and substance satisfactory to the Department, for 17        a general dental license and has complied with all 18        provisions of Section 9 of this Act, except for the 19        passage of the examination specified in subsection (e) 20        of Section 9 of this Act; or21            (ii) has applied in writing to the Department, in 22        form and substance satisfactory to the Department, for 23        a temporary dental license and has complied with all 24        provisions of subsection (c) of Section 11 of this 25        Act; and26            (iii) has been accepted or appointed for specialty   SB1463 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1        or residency training by a hospital situated in this 2        State; or3            (iv) has been accepted or appointed for specialty 4        training in an approved dental program situated in 5        this State; or6            (v) has been accepted or appointed for specialty 7        training in a dental public health agency situated in 8        this State.9        The applicant shall be permitted to practice dentistry 10    for a period of 3 months from the starting date of the 11    program, unless authorized in writing by the Department to 12    continue such practice for a period specified in writing 13    by the Department.14        The applicant shall only be entitled to perform such 15    acts as may be prescribed by and incidental to his or her 16    program of residency or specialty training and shall not 17    otherwise engage in the practice of dentistry in this 18    State.19        The authority to practice shall terminate immediately 20    upon:21            (1) the decision of the Department that the 22        applicant has failed the examination; or23            (2) denial of licensure by the Department; or24            (3) withdrawal of the application.25(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-936, eff. 1-1-23; 26103-425, eff. 1-1-24; 103-431, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff.   SB1463 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b17-1-24; 103-628, eff. 7-1-24.) 2    (225 ILCS 25/18)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2318)3    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)4    Sec. 18. Acts constituting the practice of dental hygiene; 5limitations.6    (a) A person practices dental hygiene within the meaning 7of this Act when he or she performs the following acts under 8the supervision of a dentist:9        (i) the operative procedure of dental hygiene, 10    consisting of oral prophylactic procedures;11        (ii) the exposure and processing of X-Ray films of the 12    teeth and surrounding structures;13        (iii) the application to the surfaces of the teeth or 14    gums of chemical compounds designed to be desensitizing 15    agents or effective agents in the prevention of dental 16    caries or periodontal disease;17        (iv) all services which may be performed by a dental 18    assistant as specified by rule pursuant to Section 17, and 19    a dental hygienist may engage in the placing, carving, and 20    finishing of amalgam restorations only after obtaining 21    formal education and certification as determined by the 22    Department;23        (v) administration and monitoring of nitrous oxide 24    upon successful completion of a training program approved 25    by the Department;  SB1463 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1        (vi) administration of local anesthetics upon 2    successful completion of a training program approved by 3    the Department; and4        (vii) such other procedures and acts as shall be 5    prescribed by rule or regulation of the Department.6    (b) A dental hygienist may be employed or engaged only:7        (1) by a dentist;8        (2) by a federal, State, county, or municipal agency 9    or institution;10        (3) by a public or private school; or11        (4) by a public clinic operating under the direction 12    of a hospital or federal, State, county, municipal, or 13    other public agency or institution.14    (c) When employed or engaged in the office of a dentist, a 15dental hygienist may perform, under general supervision, those 16procedures found in items (i) through (iv) of subsection (a) 17of this Section, provided the patient has been examined by the 18dentist within one year of the provision of dental hygiene 19services, the dentist has approved the dental hygiene services 20by a notation in the patient's record and the patient has been 21notified that the dentist may be out of the office during the 22provision of dental hygiene services.23    (d) If a patient of record is unable to travel to a dental 24office because of illness, infirmity, or imprisonment, a 25dental hygienist may perform, under the general supervision of 26a dentist, those procedures found in items (i) through (iv) of   SB1463 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1subsection (a) of this Section, provided the patient is 2located in a long-term care facility licensed by the State of 3Illinois, a mental health or developmental disability 4facility, or a State or federal prison. The dentist shall 5either personally examine and diagnose the patient or utilize 6approved teledentistry communication methods and determine 7which services are necessary to be performed, which shall be 8contained in an order to the hygienist and a notation in the 9patient's record. Such order must be implemented within 45 10days of its issuance; except when a patient is located within a 11State or federal prison, then the order must be implemented 12within 180 days of its issuance, and an updated medical 13history and observation of oral conditions must be performed 14by the hygienist immediately prior to beginning the procedures 15to ensure that the patient's health has not changed in any 16manner to warrant a reexamination by the dentist.17    (e) School-based oral health care, consisting of and 18limited to oral prophylactic procedures, sealants, and 19fluoride treatments, may be provided by a dental hygienist 20under the general supervision of a dentist. A dental hygienist 21may not provide other dental hygiene treatment in a 22school-based setting, including but not limited to 23administration or monitoring of nitrous oxide or 24administration of local anesthetics. The school-based 25procedures may be performed provided the patient is located at 26a public or private school and the program is being conducted   SB1463 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1by a State, county or local public health department 2initiative or in conjunction with a dental school or dental 3hygiene program. The dentist shall personally examine and 4diagnose the patient and determine which services are 5necessary to be performed, which shall be contained in an 6order to the hygienist and a notation in the patient's record. 7Any such order for sealants must be implemented within 120 8days after its issuance. Any such order for oral prophylactic 9procedures or fluoride treatments must be implemented within 10180 days after its issuance. An updated medical history and 11observation of oral conditions must be performed by the 12hygienist immediately prior to beginning the procedures to 13ensure that the patient's health has not changed in any manner 14to warrant a reexamination by the dentist.15    (f) Without the supervision of a dentist, a dental 16hygienist may perform dental health education functions, 17including instruction in proper oral health care and dental 18hygiene in, for example, a school setting, a long-term care 19facility, and a health fair. In addition, a dental hygienist 20may record case histories and oral conditions observed at any 21time prior to a clinical exam by a dentist.22    (g) The number of dental hygienists practicing in a dental 23office shall not exceed, at any one time, 4 times the number of 24dentists practicing in the office at the time.25    (h) A dental hygienist who is certified as a public health 26dental hygienist may provide services to patients: (1) who are   SB1463 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1eligible for Medicaid or (2) who are uninsured and whose 2household income is not greater than 300% of the federal 3poverty level. A public health dental hygienist may perform 4oral assessments, perform screenings, and provide educational 5and preventative services as provided in subsection (b) of 6Section 18.1 of this Act. The public health dental hygienist 7may not administer local anesthesia or nitrous oxide, or 8place, carve, or finish amalgam restorations or provide 9periodontal therapy under this exception. Each patient must 10sign a consent form that acknowledges that the care received 11does not take the place of a regular dental examination. The 12public health dental hygienist must provide the patient or 13guardian a written referral to a dentist for assessment of the 14need for further dental care at the time of treatment. Any 15indication or observation of a condition that could warrant 16the need for urgent attention must be reported immediately to 17the supervising dentist for appropriate assessment and 18treatment. 19    This subsection (h) is inoperative on and after January 1, 202026.21    (i) A dental hygienist performing procedures listed in 22paragraphs (1) through (4) of subsection (a) of Section 17.1 23must be under the supervision of a dentist, requiring the 24dentist authorizes the procedure, remains in the dental 25facility while the procedure is performed, and approves the 26work performed by the dental hygienist before dismissal of the   SB1463 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1patient, but the dentist is not required to be present at all 2times in the treatment room.3    (j) A dental hygienist may perform actions described in 4paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Section 17.1 under the 5general supervision of a dentist as described in this Section. 6(Source: P.A. 102-936, eff. 1-1-23; 103-431, eff. 1-1-24.) 7    (225 ILCS 25/18.1)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)9    Sec. 18.1. Public health dental supervision 10responsibilities.11    (a) When working together in a public health supervision 12relationship, dentists and public health dental hygienists 13shall enter into a public health supervision agreement. The 14dentist providing public health supervision must:15        (1) be available to provide an appropriate level of 16    contact, communication, collaboration, and consultation 17    with the public health dental hygienist and must meet 18    in-person with the public health dental hygienist at least 19    quarterly for review and consultation;20        (2) have specific standing orders or policy guidelines 21    for procedures that are to be carried out for each 22    location or program, although the dentist need not be 23    present when the procedures are being performed;24        (3) provide for the patient's additional necessary 25    care in consultation with the public health dental   SB1463 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1    hygienist;2        (4) file agreements and notifications as required; and3        (5) include procedures for creating and maintaining 4    dental records, including protocols for transmission of 5    all records between the public health dental hygienist and 6    the dentist following each treatment, which shall include 7    a notation regarding procedures authorized by the dentist 8    and performed by the public health dental hygienist and 9    the location where those records are to be kept. 10    Each dentist and hygienist who enters into a public health 11supervision agreement must document and maintain a copy of any 12change or termination of that agreement. 13    Dental records shall be owned and maintained by the 14supervising dentist for all patients treated under public 15health supervision, unless the supervising dentist is an 16employee of a public health clinic or federally qualified 17health center, in which case the public health clinic or 18federally qualified health center shall maintain the records. 19    If a dentist ceases to be employed or contracted by the 20facility, the dentist shall notify the facility administrator 21that the public health supervision agreement is no longer in 22effect. A new public health supervision agreement is required 23for the public health dental hygienist to continue treating 24patients under public health supervision. 25    A dentist entering into an agreement under this Section 26may supervise and enter into agreements for public health   SB1463 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1supervision with 4 public health dental hygienists. This shall 2be in addition to the limit of 4 dental hygienists per dentist 3set forth in subsection (g) of Section 18 of this Act. 4    (b) A public health dental hygienist providing services 5under public health supervision may perform only those duties 6within the accepted scope of practice of dental hygiene, as 7follows:8        (1) the operative procedures of dental hygiene, 9    consisting of oral prophylactic procedures, including 10    prophylactic cleanings, application of fluoride, and 11    placement of sealants;12        (2) the exposure and processing of x-ray films of the 13    teeth and surrounding structures; and14        (3) such other procedures and acts as shall be 15    prescribed by rule of the Department.16    Any patient treated under this subsection (b) must be 17examined by a dentist before additional services can be 18provided by a public health dental hygienist. However, if the 19supervising dentist, after consultation with the public health 20hygienist, determines that time is needed to complete an 21approved treatment plan on a patient eligible under this 22Section, then the dentist may instruct the hygienist to 23complete the remaining services prior to an oral examination 24by the dentist. Such instruction by the dentist to the 25hygienist shall be noted in the patient's records. Any 26services performed under this exception must be scheduled in a   SB1463 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1timely manner and shall not occur more than 30 days after the 2first appointment date.3    (c) A public health dental hygienist providing services 4under public health supervision must:5        (1) provide to the patient, parent, or guardian a 6    written plan for referral or an agreement for follow-up 7    that records all conditions observed that should be called 8    to the attention of a dentist for proper diagnosis;9        (2) have each patient sign a permission slip or 10    consent form that informs them that the service to be 11    received does not take the place of regular dental 12    checkups at a dental office and is meant for people who 13    otherwise would not have access to the service;14        (3) inform each patient who may require further dental 15    services of that need;16        (4) maintain an appropriate level of contact and 17    communication with the dentist providing public health 18    supervision; and19        (5) complete an additional 4 hours of continuing 20    education in areas specific to public health dentistry 21    yearly.22    (d) Each public health dental hygienist who has rendered 23services under subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this Section 24must complete a summary report at the completion of a program 25or, in the case of an ongoing program, at least annually. The 26report must be completed in the manner specified by the   SB1463 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 07067 AAS 17104 b1Department of Public Health Oral Health Section including 2information about each location where the public health dental 3hygienist has rendered these services. The public health 4dental hygienist must submit the form to the dentist providing 5supervision for his or her signature before sending it to the 6Division. The Department of Public Health Oral Health Section 7shall compile and publicize public health dental hygienist 8service data annually. 9    (e) Public health dental hygienists providing services 10under public health supervision may be compensated for their 11work by salary, honoraria, and other mechanisms by the 12employing or sponsoring entity. Nothing in this Act shall 13preclude the entity that employs or sponsors a public health 14dental hygienist from seeking payment, reimbursement, or other 15source of funding for the services provided.16    (e-5) A patient who is provided services under a 17supervision agreement by a public health dental hygienist as 18described in this Section does not need to receive a physical 19examination from a dentist prior to treatment if the public 20health dental hygienist consults with the supervising dentist 21prior to performing the teledentistry service. 22    (f) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2026.23(Source: P.A. 103-431, eff. 1-1-24; 103-902, eff. 8-9-24.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.